District of Columbia statutes.
38-2302

Transfer of real estate.

The title to all that parcel of land lying between the west boundary of West Virginia Avenue, as said avenue was laid on July 1, 1916, with a width of 66 feet, and the east boundary of the grounds of Gallaudet University, said parcel of land fronting on Florida Avenue about ten and one-half feet and containing one-tenth of an acre, more or less, and being formerly part of the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad right-of-way, shall be vested in Gallaudet University, United States of America, trustee, and the Secretary of the Interior is authorized and directed to issue a patent for the said parcel of land to the said Gallaudet College.

July 1, 1916, 39 Stat. 310, ch. 209
1981 Ed., § 31-1802.
1973 Ed., § 31-1021.
“Gallaudet University” was substituted for “Gallaudet College” pursuant to § 38-2401.01. “Gallaudet College” had previously been substituted for “the Columbia Institution for the Deaf” throughout this section, pursuant to former § 38-2305.
Adjustment of boundaries: See Act of August 3, 1939, 53 Stat. 1179, ch. 414,§§ 1 to 3.